Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1052.
do enact as follows:AB1052,13Section 1. 111.045 of the statutes is created to read:AB1052,2,24111.045 Benefits provided by labor organization. An employee who does 5not pay any dues, fees, assessments, or other charges or expenses required of 6members of, or employees represented by a labor organization, is not entitled to any 1benefits provided directly by a labor organization to members that are not 2collectively bargained by the labor organization.AB1052,2,33